Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-405
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by any action of the Department of Aeronautics in granting or denying a permit under the terms of sections 3-401 to 3-409 may appeal the action, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 5, p. 69;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 9.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.